Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.071

State song—Proceeds from sale.

All proceeds from the sale of the official song of the state as designated in RCW 1.20.070 shall be placed in the general fund.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 59 s 1; 1959 c 281 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 59: See note following RCW 43.79.420.